Washington statutes.
RCW 7.42.070

Exemptions.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to any recognized historical society or museum, the state law library, any county law library, the state library, the public library, any library of any college or university, or to any archive or library under the supervision and control of the state, county, municipality, or other political subdivision.

[ 1959 c 105 s 7.]